Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB157.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 437 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended to read:Section 437. Reports to General Assembly.--(a) Two copies of all reports required by the national center for social statistics of the Department of Health, Education and Welfare shall be furnished to the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee and the Health and Welfare Committee of the House of Representatives when they are submitted to the Federal Government. Similar reports prepared concerning general assistance, the State Blind Pension and State supplemental assistance shall be similarly furnished to the committees.(b) The department shall also issue an annual report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human 12345678910111213141516171819 Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives that includes the following information:(1) Details on information relating to the changes in how lottery winnings are counted for all forms of cash assistance, including the following:(i) Details on how many applicants reported lottery winnings of six hundred dollars ($600) or more.(ii) Details on how many of those applicants were denied assistance due to lottery winnings of six hundred dollars ($600) or more.(iii) Details on any potential gaps in communication encountered between the department and county assistance offices which may have resulted in the failed reporting of winnings of six hundred dollars ($600) or more.(iv) Details regarding ongoing strategies between the department and the Pennsylvania State Lottery in carrying out the program.(2) Details on how many vehicles were exempted in total as a result of the provisions covered under this article.(3) Details on the average equity value of vehicles counted as resources for all recipients.(4) Details on information regarding replacement access devices, including the following:(i) Details on how many recipients requested a replacement access device under section 485(a).(ii) Details on how many additional access devices were issued under section 485(b) and (b.1).(iii) Details on how many times the fee for replacement 20250SB0157PN0107 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 access devices was overridden.(iv) Details on how many recipients were reported to the Office of Inspector General for requesting two or more replacement access devices in a calendar year.(5) Details on how many instances recipients attempted to make purchases or withdraw funds in violation of section 484.(6) Details highlighting any changes in reports from previous years.(7) Any recommendations to the General Assembly that the department may deem necessary to improve the implementation of this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0157PN0107 - 3 - 123456789101112